Alabama, session 2026rs, HB151.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 16-47-91, Code of Alabama 1975,
providing for the Physicians Advisory Board of the University
of Alabama School of Medicine, is repealed.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 1

1, 2026.
HB151 Enrolled









________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 29-Jan-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 07-Apr-26 Passed



Page 2